Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202287-133
Registration; term; renewal; renewal fee; prior registration and proceedings.

(1) A registration of a mark under the Trademark Registration Act is effective for ten years after the date of registration and, upon application filed within six months prior to the expiration, in a manner complying with the requirements of the secretary, the registration may be renewed for a like term from the end of the expiring term. A renewal fee shall accompany the application for renewal of the registration. The renewal fee shall be one hundred ten dollars if the filing is submitted in writing and one hundred dollars if the filing is submitted electronically pursuant to section 84-511. A registration may be renewed for successive periods of ten years in like manner.

(2) Any registration in force under sections 87-111 to 87-125 on July 13, 2000, as such sections existed prior to such date, is effective and shall continue in full force and effect for the unexpired term of such registration. Such registration may be renewed by filing an application for renewal with the secretary complying with the requirements of the secretary and paying the renewal fee within six months prior to the expiration of the registration.

(3) Any suit, proceeding, or appeal pending on July 13, 2000, shall be decided according to sections 87-111 to 87-125 as such sections existed prior to July 13, 2000.

(4) All applications for renewal under the act shall include a verified statement that the mark has been and is still in use and include a specimen showing actual use of the mark on or in connection with the goods or services.

(5) The fees imposed under this section shall be payable to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall remit all such fees collected to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of the fees to the General Fund and forty percent of the fees to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 40.